Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Chapter 22 Wyoming Money Transmitters Act

Cross references. —

For the Wyoming Uniform Consumer Credit Code, see chapter 14 of this title.

For provisions pertaining to banks and banking, see title 13.

For provisions pertaining to savings and loan associations, see title 13, chapter 6.

§ 40-22-101.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Wyoming Money Transmitters Act.”

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

“This act” referred to in this section, is Laws 2003, ch. 60, codified as §§

40-22-101

through

40-22-129

.

§ 40-22-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Applicant” means a person filing an application for a license;

“Authorized delegate” means an entity designated by the licensee to engage in the business of money transmission on behalf of a licensee;

“Commissioner” means the state banking commissioner;

“Control” means the power to vote or ownership of twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the outstanding voting securities of a licensee or controlling person. To determine the percentage of a licensee controlled by any person, there shall be aggregated with the person’s interest the interest of any other person controlled by such person or by any spouse, parent or child of the person;

“Controlling person” means any person in control of a licensee;

“Division” means the division of banking;

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 61, § 2.

“Executive officer” means the licensee’s president, chairman of the executive committee, senior officer responsible for the licensee’s business, chief financial officer and any other person who performs similar functions;

“Key shareholder” means any person, or group of persons acting in concert, who is the owner of twenty-five percent (25%) or more of any voting class of an applicant’s stock;

“Licensee” means a person licensed under this act;

“Material litigation” means any litigation that according to generally accepted accounting principles, is deemed significant to an applicant’s or licensee’s financial health and is referenced in the applicant’s or licensee’s annual audited financial statements, report to shareholders or similar documents;

“Monetary value” means a medium of exchange whether or not redeemable in money;

“Money transmission” means to engage in business to sell or issue payment instruments or receive money or monetary value for transmission to a location within or outside the United States by any and all means, including but not limited to wire, facsimile or electronic transfer;

“Outstanding payment instrument” means any payment instrument issued by the licensee which has been sold in the United States directly by the licensee or any payment instrument issued by the licensee which has been sold by an authorized delegate or subdelegate of the licensee in the United States, which has been reported to the licensee as having been sold and which has not yet been paid by or for the licensee;

“Payment instrument” means any electronic or written check, draft, money order, travelers check or other electronic or written instrument or order for the transmission or payment of money, sold or issued to one (1) or more persons, whether or not the instrument is negotiable. “Payment instrument” shall include prepaid access as defined in 31 C.F.R. 1010.100(ww). For purposes of this act, stored value shall be deemed equivalent to prepaid access. The term “payment instrument” does not include any credit card voucher, any letter of credit or any instrument which is redeemable by the issuer in goods or services;

“Permissible investments” means:

Cash;

Certificates of deposit or other debt obligations of a financial institution, either domestic or foreign;

Bills of exchange or time drafts drawn on and accepted by a commercial bank, otherwise known as bankers’ acceptances, which are eligible for purchase by member banks of the federal reserve system;

Any investment securities bearing a rating of one (1) of the four (4) highest grades as defined by a nationally recognized organization that rates securities;

Investment securities that are obligations of the United States, its agencies or instrumentalities, or obligations that are guaranteed fully as to principal and interest of the United States, or any obligations of any state, municipality or any political subdivision thereof;

Shares in a money market mutual fund, interest bearing bills, notes or bonds, debentures or stock traded on any national securities exchange or on a national over the counter market, or mutual funds primarily composed of such securities or a fund composed of one (1) or more permissible investments as set forth in this paragraph;

Any demand borrowing agreement made to a corporation or a subsidiary of a corporation whose capital stock is listed on a national exchange;

Receivables which are due to a licensee from its authorized delegates or subdelegates which are not past due or doubtful of collection; or

Any other investments or security device approved by the commissioner.

“Remit” means either to make direct payment of the funds to the licensee or its representatives authorized to receive those funds, or to deposit the funds in a bank, credit union or savings and loan association or other similar financial institution in an account specified by the licensee;

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 61, § 2.

“Channeling agent” means the third party licensing system that gathers the application information and distributes it to Wyoming for review for the approval or denial decision;

“Registry” means the nationwide licensing system and registry maintained by the State Regulatory Registry, LLC;

“Subdelegate” means an entity designated by an authorized delegate by written contract to engage in the business of money transmission on behalf of a licensee;

“Virtual currency” means any type of digital representation of value that:

Is used as a medium of exchange, unit of account or store of value; and

Is not recognized as legal tender by the United States government.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1; 2013 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2013 ch. 27, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2018 ch. 3, § 1, effective March 7, 2018; 2021 ch. 61, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2013 amendments. —

The first
2013 amendment by ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2013, in (a)(xiv) added “or subdelegate”; in (a)(xvi)(H) substituted “or subdelegates” for “pursuant to a contract described in W.S.

40-22-118

”; and added (a)(xix) (now (a)(xxi)).

The second 2013 amendment by ch. 27, § 1, effective July 1, 2013, added (a)(xix) and (a)(xx).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2018 amendment,

added (a)(xxii).

Laws 2018,
ch. 3, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art.
4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2018.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 61, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, in (a)(ii), deleted "transmitting," added "transmission"; deleted ", stored value" following "instruments" in (a)(xiii); and added the second sentence in (a)(xv).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 61, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, repealed (a)(vii), which read, "'Electronic instrument' means a card or other tangible object for the transmission or payment of money which contains a microprocessor chip, magnetic stripe or other means for the storage of information that is prefunded and for which the value is decremented upon each use, but does not include a card or other tangible object that is redeemable by the issuer in goods or services"; and repealed (a)(xviii), which read, "'Stored value' means monetary value that is evidenced by an electronic record."

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applicability. —

Laws 2013, ch. 27, § 3, states: “This act shall apply to new licenses issued by the division of banking under the Uniform Consumer Credit Code and the Money Transmitter Act on or after July 1, 2013. The provisions of law existing prior to amendment by this act shall apply to renewal of licenses issued by the division of banking under the Uniform Consumer Credit Code and the Money Transmitter Act prior to July 1, 2013.”

§ 40-22-103.
License required.

With the exception of those persons exempt pursuant to W.S.

40-22-104

, on and after October 1, 2003, no person shall engage in the business of money transmission without a license. The division shall regulate money transmitters and carry out the provisions of this act [§§

40-22-101

through

40-22-129

].

A person is engaged in the business of money transmission if the person advertises, offers or provides services to Wyoming residents, for personal, family or household use, through any medium including, but not limited to, internet or other electronic means.

A licensee with a physical presence in this state may conduct its business at one (1) or more locations, directly or indirectly owned, or through one (1) or more authorized delegates or subdelegates, or both, pursuant to a single license granted to the licensee, provided that for each business name, a separate license shall be required.

Every licensee, authorized delegate and subdelegate shall comply with the Bank Secrecy Act, 12 U.S.C. 1951 et seq.

Authorized delegates or subdelegates of a licensee, acting within the scope of authority conferred by a written contract as described in W.S.

40-22-118

shall not be required to obtain a license.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1; 2013 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013,
deleted “regularly” preceding “advertises” and added “for personal, family or household use” in (b); in (c) added “or subdelegates”;
substituted the comma for “and” following “licensee”, and added “and subdelegate” in (d); and in (e) added “or subdelegates”.

§ 40-22-104.
Exemptions; applicability.

This act shall not apply to:

The United States or any department, agency, or instrumentality thereof;

The United States post office;

The state or any political subdivisions thereof;

Banks, bank holding companies, credit unions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, savings banks or mutual banks organized under the laws of any state or the United States provided that they do not issue or sell payment instruments through authorized delegates or subdelegates who are not banks, bank holding companies, credit unions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, savings banks or mutual banks;

Electronic transfer of government benefits for any federal, state or county governmental agency as defined in Federal Reserve Board Regulation E by a contractor for and on behalf of the United States or any department, agency or instrumentality thereof, or any state or any political subdivisions thereof;

Buying, selling, issuing, or taking custody of payment instruments in the form of virtual currency or receiving virtual currency for transmission to a location within or outside the United States by any means;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 170, § 4.

A person engaged in the business of money transmission under this act that does not meet the definition of a money services business under 31 C.F.R. 1010.100(ff), as amended as of January 1, 2020.

The Financial Technology Sandbox Act shall apply to this act.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1; 2013 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2018 ch. 3, § 1, effective March 7, 2018; 2018 ch. 44, § 2, effective March 10, 2018; 2019 ch. 61, § 3, effective January 1, 2020; 2019 ch. 170, § 4, effective February 28, 2019; 2020 ch. 52, § 1, effective March 10, 2020; 2021 ch. 61, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “or subdelegates” in (a)(iv).

The 2018 amendments.
—

The first 2018 amendment,
by ch. 3, § 1,
added (a)(vi) and made related stylistic changes.

Laws 2018,
ch. 3, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art.
4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2018.

The second
2018 amendment, by ch. 44, § 2,
added (a)(vi) and made related
stylistic changes.

Laws 2018,
ch. 44, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art.
4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2018.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, added (b).

The 2020 amendment

added (a)(viii).

Laws 2020, ch. 52, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2020.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted "or stored value" following "instruments" in (a)(vi).

§ 40-22-105.
License requirements.

Each licensee shall at all times have a net worth of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00), as calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

Every corporate applicant at the time of filing of an application for a license and at all times after a license is issued, shall be in good standing in the state of its incorporation. All noncorporate applicants shall at the time of the filing of an application for a license and at all times after a license is issued, be registered or qualified to do business in the state.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1.

§ 40-22-106.
Bond or other security device.

A surety bond, irrevocable letter of credit or other similar security device acceptable to the commissioner shall be provided with a license application or upon approval of the application, as determined by the applicant. An application without a security device may be conditionally approved by the commissioner pending receipt of the security device. The surety bond, irrevocable letter of credit or other security device shall be in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) or two and one-half (21/2) times the outstanding payment instruments, whichever is greater, not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00). The commissioner may increase the required amount of the security device up to the maximum amount authorized by this subsection upon the basis of the impaired financial condition of a licensee as evidenced by a reduction in net worth, financial losses or other relevant criteria. The security device shall be in a form satisfactory to the commissioner and shall run to the state for the benefit of any claimants against the licensee to secure the faithful performance of the obligations of the licensee with respect to the receipt, handling, transmission and payment of money in connection with the sale and issuance of payment instruments or transmission of money. In the case of a bond, the aggregate liability of the surety in no event shall exceed the principal sum of the bond. Claimants against the licensee may bring suit directly on the security device or the commissioner may bring suit on behalf of the claimants either in one (1) action or in successive actions.

In lieu of a security device or any portion of the principal thereof as required by this section, the licensee may deposit with the commissioner or with banks in this state as the licensee may designate and the commissioner may approve, cash, interest bearing stocks and bonds, notes, debentures or other obligations of the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or guaranteed by the United States, or of this state or a political subdivision, or guaranteed by this state, to an aggregate amount, based upon principal amount or market value, whichever is lower, of not less than the amount of the security device or portion thereof. The securities or cash shall be deposited and held to secure the same obligations as would the security device. The depositor shall be entitled to receive all interest and dividends and shall have the right with the approval of the commissioner, to substitute other securities for those deposited, and shall be required to do so on written order of the commissioner made for good cause shown.

The security device shall remain in effect until cancellation, which may occur only after written notice to the commissioner thirty (30) days prior to the effective date of cancellation. Cancellation shall not affect any liability incurred or accrued during the thirty (30) day period.

The security device shall remain in place for no longer than five (5) years after the licensee ceases money transmission operations in the state. The commissioner may permit the security device to be reduced or eliminated prior to the five (5) years to the extent that the amount of the licensee’s payment instruments outstanding in this state are reduced. The commissioner may also permit a licensee to substitute a letter of credit or other form of security device acceptable to the commissioner for the security device in place at the time the licensee ceases money transmission operations in the state.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1; 2021 ch. 61, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the first sentence of (a), substituted "A" for "Each application shall be accompanied by," added "shall be provided with a license application or upon approval of the application, as determined by the applicant," added the second sentence, in the third sentence, added "An application without a security device may be conditionally approved by the commissioner pending receipt of the security device. The surety bond, irrevocable letter of credit or other security device shall be" and ", not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00), and in the fourth sentence, deleted "bond or" preceding "security" added "up" following "device," substituted "the" for "a" preceding "maximum" and substituted "amount authorized by this subsection" for "of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00)."

§ 40-22-107.
Permissible investments and statutory trust.

Each licensee shall at all times possess permissible investments having an aggregate market value calculated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, of not less than the aggregate face amount of all outstanding payment instruments issued or sold by the licensee in the United States. This requirement may be waived by the commissioner if the dollar volume of a licensee’s outstanding payment instruments does not exceed the bond or other security devices posted by the licensee pursuant to W.S.

40-22-106

.

Permissible investments even if commingled with other assets of the licensee, shall be deemed by operation of law to be held in trust for the benefit of the purchasers and holders of the licensee’s outstanding payment instruments in the event of the bankruptcy of the licensee.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1; 2013 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “and stored value” following “instruments” in the first and second sentence in (a).

§ 40-22-108.
Application for license.

Each application for a license shall be made in writing and in a form prescribed by the commissioner. Each application shall include the following:

The exact name of the applicant, the applicant’s principal address, any fictitious or trade name used by the applicant in the conduct of its business and the location of the applicant’s business records;

The applicant’s history of material litigation and criminal convictions that relate to the practice of money transmission or to the ability to practice money transmission for the five (5) year period prior to the date of the application;

A description of the activities conducted by the applicant and a history of operations;

A description of the business activities in which the applicant seeks to be engaged in the state;

A list identifying the applicant’s proposed authorized delegates or subdelegates in the state, if any, at the time of the filing of the license application;

A sample authorized delegate contract, if applicable;

A sample form of payment instrument, if applicable;

The location at which the applicant and its authorized delegates and its subdelegates, if any, propose to conduct the licensed activities in the state; and

The name and address of the clearing bank on which payment instruments will be drawn or through which the payment instruments will be payable.

If the applicant is a corporation, the applicant shall also provide:

The date of the applicant’s incorporation and state of incorporation;

A certificate of good standing from the state in which the applicant was incorporated;

A description of the corporate structure of the applicant, including the identity of any parent or subsidiary of the applicant and the disclosure of whether any parent or subsidiary is publicly traded on any stock exchange;

The name, business and residence address and employment history for the past five (5) years of the applicant’s executive officers and the officer or manager who will be in charge of the applicant’s licensed activities in this state;

The name, business and residence address, and employment history for the period five (5) years prior to the date of the application of any key shareholder of the applicant;

The history of material litigation and criminal convictions for the five (5) year period prior to the date of the application of every executive officer or key shareholder of the applicant;

A copy of the applicant’s most recent audited financial statement including balance sheet, statement of income or loss, statement of changes in shareholder equity and statement of changes in financial position and if available, the applicant’s audited financial statements for the immediately preceding two (2) year period. Provided, if the applicant is a wholly owned subsidiary of another corporation, the applicant may submit either the parent corporation’s consolidated audited financial statements for the current year and for the immediately preceding two (2) year period or the parent corporation’s Form 10K reports filed with the United States securities and exchange commission for the prior three (3) years in lieu of the applicant’s financial statements. If the applicant is a wholly owned subsidiary of a corporation having its principal place of business outside the United States, similar documentation filed with the parent corporation’s non United States regulator may be submitted to satisfy this provision; and

Copies of all filings, if any, made by the applicant with the United States securities and exchange commission or with a similar regulator in a country other than the United States, within the year preceding the date of filing of the application.

If the applicant is not a corporation, the applicant shall also provide:

The name, business and residence address, personal financial statement and employment history for the past five (5) years, of each principal of the applicant and the name, business and residence address and employment history for the past five (5) years of any other person or persons who will be in charge of the applicant’s licensed activities;

The place and date of the applicant’s registration or qualification to do business in this state;

The history of material litigation and criminal convictions for the five (5) year period prior to the date of the application for each individual having any ownership interest in the applicant and each individual who exercises supervisory responsibility with respect to the applicant’s activities; and

Copies of the applicant’s audited financial statements including balance sheet, statement of income or loss and statement of changes in financial position for the current year and if available, for the immediately preceding two (2) year period.

The commissioner is authorized for good cause shown, to waive any requirement of this section with respect to any license application or to permit a license applicant to submit substituted information in its license application in lieu of the information required by this section.

The commissioner may require a licensee under this act or an applicant for a license issued under this act to submit to a background investigation including fingerprint checks for state, national and international criminal history record checks as necessary. While exercising his authority under this subsection, the commissioner may utilize background checks completed by the division of criminal investigation, other government agencies in this state or in other states, the federal bureau of investigation or the registry or any other entity designated by the registry.

The commissioner may determine the content of application forms and the means by which an applicant applies for, renews or amends a license under this act. The commissioner may allow applicants to utilize the registry or an entity designated by the registry for the processing of applications and fees.

In order to fulfill the purposes of this act, the commissioner may establish relationships or contract with the registry or any other entity designated by the registry to collect and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or other persons subject to this act.

In connection with an application for licensing the applicant shall, at a minimum, furnish the commissioner or the registry information concerning the identity of the applicant, the owners or persons in charge of the applicant and individuals designated in charge of the applicant’s places of business, including:

Fingerprints for submission to the federal bureau of investigation, and any governmental agency or entity authorized to receive such information for a state, national and international criminal history background check; and

Personal history and experience, including the submission of authorization for the registry or the commissioner to obtain:

An independent credit report obtained from a consumer reporting agency described in section 603(p) of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act; and

Information related to any administrative, civil or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction.

For the purposes of this section and in order to reduce the points of contact which the federal bureau of investigation may have to maintain for purposes of paragraph (h)(i) of this section and subparagraph (h)(ii)(B) of this section, the commissioner may use the registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from and distributing information to the department of justice or any governmental agency.

For the purposes of this section and in order to reduce the points of contact which the commissioner may have to maintain for purposes of paragraph (h)(ii) of this section, the commissioner may use the registry as a channeling agent for requesting and distributing information to and from any source as directed by the commissioner.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1; 2013 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2013 ch. 27, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 61, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2013 amendments. —

The first
2013 amendment, by ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2013, added “or subdelegates” in (a)(v); and added “and its subdelegates” in (a)(viii).

The second 2013 amendment, by ch. 27, § 1, effective July 1, 2013, added (e) through (k).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(ii),
inserted “that relate
to the practice of money transmission
or to the ability to practice
money transmission” following
“convictions.”

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "commissioner" for "administrator" throughout the section.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Section 603(p) of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act is codified at 15 USCS § 1681a(p).

Applicability. —

Laws 2013, ch. 27, § 3, directs:
“This act shall apply to new licenses issued
by the division of banking
under the Uniform Consumer Credit Code
and the Money Transmitter Act
on or after July 1, 2013. The provisions
of law existing prior to
amendment by this act shall apply to renewal
of licenses issued by
the division of banking under the Uniform Consumer
Credit Code and
the Money Transmitter Act prior to July 1, 2013.”

§ 40-22-109.
Application fee.

Each application shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee not to exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000.00) for each license applied for, as set by rule of the commissioner. Any fee charged and collected under this section shall be in accordance with W.S. 13-1-603(d) through (f).

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1; 2021 ch. 40, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added the last sentence.

§ 40-22-110.
Issuance of license.

After the applicant files an application, the commissioner shall investigate the financial condition and responsibility, financial and business experience, character and general fitness of the applicant. The commissioner may conduct an on site investigation of the applicant, the reasonable cost of which shall be borne by the applicant. If the commissioner finds that the applicant’s business will be conducted honestly, fairly and in a manner commanding the confidence and trust of the community and that the applicant has fulfilled the requirements imposed by this act and has paid the required application fee, the commissioner shall issue a license to the applicant authorizing the applicant to engage in the licensed activities in this state for a term of one (1) year. If these requirements have not been met, the commissioner shall deny the application in writing setting forth the reasons for the denial.

The commissioner shall approve or deny every application for an original license within one hundred twenty (120) days from the date a complete application is submitted, provided the time period may be extended with written consent of the applicant. The commissioner shall notify the applicant of the date when the application is deemed complete. In the absence of approval or denial of the application within time period allowed or consented to, the application is deemed approved and the commissioner shall issue the license effective as of the first day after the one hundred twenty (120) day or extended period has elapsed.

Any applicant aggrieved by a denial issued by the commissioner under this section may at any time within thirty (30) days from the date of receipt of written notice of the denial request a hearing before the commissioner.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1.

§ 40-22-111.
Renewal of license and annual report.

Each license issued under this act shall expire on December 31. The license shall be renewed annually not later than December 1. Each licensee shall pay an annual renewal fee as set by rule of the commissioner.

The renewal fee shall be accompanied by a report, in a form approved by the commissioner, which shall include:

A copy of the licensee’s most recent audited consolidated annual financial statement including balance sheet, statement of income or loss, statement of changes in shareholder’s equity and statement of changes in financial position, or in the case of a licensee that is a wholly owned subsidiary of another corporation, the consolidated audited annual financial statement of the parent corporation may be filed in lieu of the licensee’s audited annual financial statement;

For the most recent quarter for which data is available prior to the date of the filing of the renewal application, but in no event more than one hundred twenty (120) days prior to the renewal date, the licensee shall provide the number of payment instruments sold by the licensee in the state, the dollar amount of those instruments and the dollar amount of those instruments currently outstanding;

Any material changes to any of the information submitted by the licensee on its original application which have not previously been reported to the commissioner on any other report required to be filed under this act;

A list of the licensee’s permissible investments;

A list of the locations, if any, within this state at which business regulated by this act is being conducted by either the licensee or its authorized delegates or its subdelegates;

The commissioner is authorized for good cause shown to waive any requirement of this section with respect to any license renewal application or to permit a license renewal applicant to submit substituted information in its license renewal application in lieu of the information required by this section.

A licensee that has not filed a renewal report or paid its renewal fee by the renewal filing deadline and has not been granted an extension of time to do so by the commissioner, shall have its license suspended on the renewal date. The licensee has thirty (30) days after its license is suspended in which to file a renewal report and pay the renewal fee.

Any fee charged and collected under this section shall be in accordance with W.S. 13-1-603(d) through (f).

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1; 2013 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2013 ch. 27, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2021 ch. 40, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 61, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2013 amendments. —

The first 2013 amendment, by ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2013, added “and subdelegates” in (a); and added “or its subdelegates” in (b)(v).

The second
2013 amendment, by ch. 27, § 1, effective July 1, 2013, substituted “Each license issued under this act shall expire on December 31.
The license shall be renewed annually not later than December 1.” for “Each year on October 1” in (a).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 40, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, added (d).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 61, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, deleted "not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), plus not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each authorized delegate and subdelegate not to exceed seven thousand dollars ($7,000.00)," following "renewal fee" in the second sentence of (a).

Applicability. —

Laws 2013, ch. 27, § 3, directs: "This act shall apply to new licenses issued by the division of banking under the Uniform Consumer Credit Code and the Money Transmitter Act on or after July 1, 2013. The provisions of law existing prior to amendment by this act shall apply to renewal of licenses issued by the division of banking under the Uniform Consumer Credit Code and the Money Transmitter Act prior to July 1, 2013."

§ 40-22-112.
Licensee liability.

A licensee’s liability to any person for a money transmission conducted on that person’s behalf by the licensee or an authorized delegate or a subdelegate shall be limited to the amount of money transmitted or the face amount of the payment instrument purchased.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1; 2013 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “or a subdelegate”, and deleted “or stored value” before “purchased”.

§ 40-22-113.
Extraordinary reporting requirements.

Within fifteen (15) business days of the occurrence of any one (1) of the events listed in this subsection, a licensee shall file a written report with the commissioner describing the event and its expected impact on the licensee’s activities in the state:

Any material changes in information provided in a licensee’s application or renewal report;

The filing for bankruptcy or reorganization by the licensee;

The institution of revocation or suspension proceedings against the licensee by any state or governmental authority with regard to the licensee’s money transmission activities;

Any felony indictment or conviction of the licensee or any of its executive officers related to money transmission activities.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1.

§ 40-22-114.
Changes in control of a licensee.

A licensee shall give the commissioner written notice of a proposed change of control within fifteen (15) business days after learning of the proposed change of control.

The commissioner may require the licensee to provide additional information concerning the proposed persons in control of the licensee. The additional information shall be limited to the same types required of the licensee or persons in control of the licensee as part of its original license or renewal application.

The licensee shall reapply and submit the required fees established by rule, not to exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000.00) for a new license upon a change in the control of the licensee as determined by the commissioner. The license is not transferable nor assignable to the new persons in control of the licensee. Any fee charged and collected under this section by the commissioner shall be in accordance with W.S. 13-1-603(d) through (f).

The following persons are exempt from the requirements of subsections (a) through (c) of this section, but the licensee shall notify the commissioner of a change of control:

A person that acts as a proxy for the sole purpose of voting at a designated meeting of the security holders or holders of voting interests of a licensee or person in control of a licensee;

A person that acquires control of a licensee by devise or descent;

A person that acquires control as a personal representative, custodian, guardian, conservator, or trustee, or as an officer appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction or by operation of law; and

A person that the commissioner by rule or order exempts in the public interest.

Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to public offerings of securities.

Before filing a request for approval to acquire control, a person may request in writing a determination from the commissioner as to whether the person would be considered a person in control of a licensee upon consummation of a proposed transaction. If the commissioner determines that the person would not be a person in control of a licensee, the commissioner shall enter an order to that effect and the proposed person and transaction is not subject to the requirements of subsections (a) through (c) of this section.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1; 2021 ch. 40, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added the last sentence in (c).

§ 40-22-115.
Examinations.

The commissioner may conduct examinations of persons licensed under this act at intervals he deems necessary to determine whether violations of this act and other applicable laws, rules and regulations pertaining to money transmissions are occurring and the frequency and seriousness of the violations.

Each licensee or person subject to examination or investigation under this act shall pay to the commissioner an amount assessed by the commissioner to cover the direct cost of examinations or investigations conducted pursuant to this section.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 60, § 1; 2021 ch. 61, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted "and indirect" following "direct" in (b).